Utah statutes.
63G-6a-503.   Request for information and response nonbinding.

(1)  A request for information is not a procurement process and may not be used to make a purchase or enter into a contract.  A procurement unit is required to use a standard procurement process, or comply with an exception to the requirement to use a standard procurement process described in Part 8, Exceptions to Procurement Requirements, in order to make a purchase or enter into a contract.

(2)  A response to a request for information is not an offer and may not be accepted to form a binding contract.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

